Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,211
Judgment against state; certify to Director of Administrative Services; payment; insufficient funds.

The court by which any judgment is rendered against the state shall certify such judgment to the Director of Administrative Services, who shall pay the same from any special fund or appropriation applicable to such judgment, and if no special fund or appropriation has been provided or made, then from any appropriations made to the department or institution, relating to which the cause of action arose. A certificate of the Director of Administrative Services, or of the chief officer of such department or institution, that the current appropriations will not permit payment of such judgment without great public inconvenience, shall operate as a stay of such judgment until the adjournment of the next regular session of the Legislature. When such stay is claimed or taken, interest shall run on such judgment from the date on which the court certified the judgment to the Director of Administrative Services at the rate set in section 45-103.

Laws 1877, § 12, p. 22;

R.S.1913, § 1188;

C.S.1922, § 1110;

C.S.1929, § 27-329;

R.S.1943, § 24-329;

Laws 1979, LB 3, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-329;

Laws 2004, LB 692, § 1.